Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-545
Transportation of gas; operation of pipeline facilities; safety standards; requirements.

(1) Each person who engages in the transportation of gas or who owns or operates pipeline facilities shall (a) at all times after the date any applicable safety standard established under sections 81-503, 81-505, 81-525, and 81-542 to 81-552 takes effect comply with the requirements of such standard; (b) file and comply with a plan of inspection and maintenance required by section 81-548; and (c) permit access to or copying of records, and make reports or provide information, and permit entry or inspection, as required under section 81-549.

(2) Nothing in sections 81-503, 81-505, 81-525, and 81-542 to 81-552 shall affect the common-law or statutory tort liability of any person.

Laws 1969, c. 763, § 4, p. 2887.